test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-n_31m_lumi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - lumi - ok : # Noun 'snø' - ok
     lumi+N+Sg+Nom: lumi
     lumi+N+Sg+Gen: lumen
     lumi+N+Sg+Par: lunta
     lumi+N+Sg+Tra: lumeksi
     lumi+N+Sg+Abe: lumetta
     lumi+N+Sg+Ine: lumessa
     lumi+N+Sg+Ela: lumesta
     lumi+N+Sg+Ill: lumheen
     lumi+N+Sg+Ade: lumela
     lumi+N+Sg+Abl: lumelta
     lumi+N+Sg+All: lumele
     lumi+N+Sg+Ess: lumena
     lumi+N+Pl+Nom: lumet
     lumi+N+Pl+Ine: lumissa
     lumi+N+Pl+Ela: lumista
     lumi+N+Pl+Ill: lumhiin
     lumi+N+Pl+Ade: lumila
     lumi+N+Pl+Abl: lumilta
     lumi+N+Pl+All: lumile
     lumi+N+Pl+Ess: lumina
     lumi+N+Pl+Gen: [lummiin, lumitten] # lummiin Por ja Rai varieteetissä 
     lumi+N+Pl+Par: lummii
     lumi+N+Pl+Tra: lumiksi
     lumi+N+Pl+Abe: lumitta
     lumi+N+Pl+Com: lumine
